Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 368, O.S.L.
2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 8-114), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 8-114. A. Except as provided in subsection B of this
section, beginning July 1, 2024, the transfer of a student from one
school site to another school site within the school district where
the student resides shall be approved at any time in the year,
unless the grade level of the receiving school site has reached
capacity. If the capacity of a grade level is insufficient to
Req. No. 12425 Page 1

enro ll all eligible students, the school district shall select
intra-district transfer students based on the preferences outlined
in paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section and then in the order
in which the intra-district transfer applications were received.
The school district board of education shall determine the capacity
of a school site based on its policy adopted pursuant to subsection
B of this section. A student may be granted a one-year intra-
district transfer and may automatically continue to attend the
school site where the student transferred each school year with the
approval of the school district. Students previously granted an
intra-district transfer may have the option to continue an intra-
district transfer as they transition to the next school in the
attendance zone pattern. At the end of each school year, a school
district may deny continued intra-district transfer of the student
for the reasons outlined in paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection B of
this section. Districts may also deny an intra-district transfer
request when the district has adjusted attendance zones for managing
student enrollment.
1. Any sibling of a student who transfers intra-district may
attend the school site to which the student transferred if the
school district policy gives preference to sibling transfers
regardless of capacity and the sibling of the transferred student
does not meet a basis for denial as outlined in paragraphs 2 and 3
of subsection B of this section.
Req. No. 12425 Page 2

2. The child of a school district employee who resides in the
school district but wishes to attend a different school site within
the school district where the student resides may be granted an
intra-district transfer if the school district policy gives
preference to the transfer of children of school district employees
and the student does not meet a basis for denial as outlined in
paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection B of this section.
3. A student who changes residence within a school district and
who wishes to attend the same school site may be granted an intra-
district transfer if the school district policy gives preference to
such transfers and the student does not meet a basis for denial as
outlined in paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection B of this section.
4. A student may be granted an intra-district transfer to
participate in specialized programs within the district if the
school district policy gives preference to such transfers and the
student does not meet a basis for denial as outlined in paragraphs 2
and 3 of subsection B of this section.
5. Any child in the custody of the Department of Human Services
and living in foster care who resides in the home of another student
who transfers intra-district may attend the school site to which the
student transferred.
Except for a child in the custody of the Department of Human
Services in foster care, an intra-district transfer student shall
not transfer more than two times one time per school year to other
Req. No. 12425 Page 3

scho ol sites within the school district where the student resides,
provided that the student may always reenroll at any time in his or
her school site of residence.
B. Each school district board of education shall adopt a policy
to determine the number of intra-district transfer students the
school district has the capacity to accept in each grade level for
each school site within a school district no later than July 1,
2024. The policy shall be publicly posted on the school district
website. The policy:
1. Shall include an enrollment preference and reserve capacity
for:
a. students who reside in the school site boundary,
b. students who attended the school site the prior school
year,
c. siblings of students who are already enrolled at the
school site,
d. children of school district employees who wish to
attend a different school site within the school
district, and
e. students who change residence within a school district
and who wish to attend the same school site;
2. May include the acts and reasons outlined in Section 24-
101.3 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title as a basis for
denial of an intra-district transfer; and
Req. No. 12425 Page 4

3. May include a history of absences as a basis for denial of
an intra-district transfer. For the purposes of this section,
"history of absences" means ten or more absences in one (1) semester
that are not excused for the reasons provided in subsection B of
Section 10-105 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title or
due to illness.
C. By the first day of January, April, July, and October of
each year, the school district board of education shall establish
the number of intra-district transfer students the school district
has the capacity to accept in each grade level for each school site
within the district.
D. After establishing the number of intra-district transfer
students the school district has the capacity to accept in each
grade level for each school site, the school district board of
education shall:
1. Publish in a prominent place on the school district website
the number of intra-district transfer students for each grade level
for each school site within the school district which the district
has the capacity to accept; and
2. Report to the State Department of Education the number of
intra-district transfer students for each grade level for each
school site within the school district which the district has the
capacity to accept.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
Req. No. 12425 Page 5

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12425 SW 02/06/25


















Req. No. 12425 Page 6